Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Part 7

Environmental Protection

60-1-701. Measures by operator at well site.

At the well site, the operator shall take measures to prevent or minimize soil erosion and pollution of surface waters during the life of the operation. Such measures shall include sediment ponds, berms, diversion ditches, hay bales, and other measures designed to prevent erosion and discharge of pollutants from the well site.

Acts 1987, ch. 257, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Into the Fracking Fray: A Balanced Approach to Regulating Hydraulic Fracturing in Tennessee, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 667 (2014).

60-1-702. Access roads.

Access roads shall be constructed in such a manner as to reduce erosion to a practical minimum.

Any regulations promulgated pursuant to this part concerning access roads shall be guidelines only and shall not be mandatory.

Acts 1987, ch. 257, §§ 3, 7.

60-1-703. Manner of accomplishing reclamation of disturbed areas.

Reclamation of all disturbed areas shall be accomplished in the following manner:

The vegetative cover must be diverse, effective, and permanent. It must be capable of long-term stabilization of the soil and must not impede natural vegetative succession or interfere with surrounding vegetative cover;

The permanent reclamation plant species must be capable of self-regeneration and must have the same seasonal characteristics of growth as the original vegetation. A different plant species not having these characteristics may be used to establish a quick-growing, temporary cover to stabilize the disturbed area;

Suitable mulch and soil nutrients shall be applied where necessary to stabilize a regraded area and to establish the vegetative cover;

Except for active work areas, a temporary vegetative cover shall be planted on all disturbed areas within thirty (30) days of the initial disturbance;

Within thirty (30) days of the plugging of a well, the permanent vegetative cover shall be planted on all disturbed areas;

Access roads are subject to all the above reclamation requirements unless the landowner establishes by sworn affidavit that a road will continue to be used for other legitimate purposes and maintained in usable condition, which condition reduces erosion to a practical minimum, by the surface owner. An access road may continue to be used by the operator to gain access to the well site in order to determine the adequacy of the vegetation cover or to perform additional revegetation;

Revegetation success shall not be determined until after two (2) successfully completed growing seasons have occurred; and

Revegetation shall be considered successful if a ground cover of at least ninety percent (90%) herbaceous and/or woody species is achieved, so long as at least eighty percent (80%) are perennial species.

Acts 1987, ch. 257, § 3.

60-1-704. Release of reclamation bond.

Upon satisfactory completion of regrading and revegetation of all disturbed areas except active work areas and access roads needed for oil or gas production, the supervisor shall release one third (1/3) of the reclamation bond. After plugging, and upon final reclamation and satisfactory survival of the vegetation through two (2) growing seasons, the supervisor shall release the remainder of the reclamation bond.

For the purposes of this section, “active work area” means that portion of the initially disturbed area necessary for production-related equipment, materials and facilities, as determined by the supervisor.

Acts 1987, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 352, § 1.

60-1-705. Failure to perform — Forfeiture of bond — Securing performance.

Upon failure of any operator to perform site protection or reclamation activities, as required by this chapter, and notice of default, if the default is not cured within a reasonable time by the operator or the surety, if any, on the operator's bond, the board shall declare the bond forfeited, collect the bond and use the proceeds for the required site protection or reclamation work. The supervisor may contract with any person or public agency to perform the reclamation work. Any portion of the bond not thus expended shall be refunded to the operator or the operator's surety if the conditions of the bond are fully satisfied. If the conditions of the bond are not fully satisfied, because the bond is a blanket bond or otherwise, the unexpended proceeds shall be held or applied in a manner to secure the performance of the remaining obligations secured by the bond. If the bond is a blanket bond and the unexpended portion is less than is required for the remaining wells covered by the bond, a supplementary bond shall be required.

Acts 1987, ch. 257, § 3.

60-1-202. Powers of board.